Illinois, session 104th, HB4014.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $6,000,000, or so much of that amount 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department on Aging for distribution to Area 7Agencies on Aging for services provided under the Family 8Caregiver Act. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102025.